New Mexico, session 2026, SB98.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 18-6-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1969, Chapter 223, Section 3, as amended) is amended to read: "18-6-3. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Cultural Properties Act: A. "committee" means the cultural properties review committee; B. "cultural property" means a structure, place, site or object having historic, archaeological, scientific, architectural or other cultural significance and does not include a jetty jack; C. "jetty jack" means a jack made of steel and heavy wire installed by the United States bureau of reclamation and United States army corps of engineers for river bank maintenance; [C.] D. "registered cultural property" means a cultural property that has been placed on the official register on either a permanent or temporary basis by the committee; [D.] E. "official register" means the New Mexico register of cultural properties maintained by the committee for the purpose of recording cultural properties deemed worthy of preservation; and [E.] F. "state land" means property owned, controlled or operated by a department, agency, institution or political subdivision of the state." SECTION 2. Section 18-6A-2 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1993, Chapter 176, Section 2, as amended) is amended to read: "18-6A-2. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Cultural Properties Protection Act: A. "committee" means the cultural properties review committee; B. "cultural property" means a structure, place, site or object having historic, archaeological, scientific, architectural or other cultural significance and does not include a jetty jack; C. "division" means the historic preservation division of the cultural affairs department; D. "fund" means the cultural properties restoration fund; E. "interpretation" means the inventory, registration, mapping and analysis of cultural properties and public educational programs designed to prevent the loss of cultural properties; F. "jetty jack" means a jack made of steel and heavy wire installed by the United States bureau of reclamation and United States army corps of engineers for river bank maintenance; [F.] G. "officer" means the state historic preservation officer; [G.] H. "preservation" means sustaining the existing form, integrity and material of a cultural property or the existing form and vegetative cover of a cultural property and may include protective maintenance or stabilization where necessary in the case of archaeological sites; [H.] I. "professional survey" means an archaeological or architectural survey; [I.] J. "protection" means safeguarding the physical condition or environment of a cultural property from deterioration or damage caused by weather or other natural, animal or human intrusions; [J.] K. "restoration" means recovering the general historic appearance of a cultural property or the form and details of an object or structure by removing incompatible natural or human-caused accretions and replacing missing elements as appropriate; [K.] L. "stabilization" means reestablishing the structural stability or weather-resistant condition of a cultural property or arresting deterioration that may lead to structural failure; [L.] M. "state agency" means a department, agency, institution or political subdivision of the state; and [M.] N. "state land" means property owned, controlled or operated by a state agency." - 4 -